Maryland, session 2026, HB0134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
TITLE 15. VISITATION.
15–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0134*

HOUSE BILL 134
(B) “ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON” MEANS THE
PERSON THE PETITIONER SEEKS TO VISIT.
(C) “HEALTH CARE FACILITY” MEANS:
(1) AN ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM;
(2) A HOSPICE;
(3) A HOSPITAL; OR
(4) A NURSING HOME.
(D) (1) “INTERESTED PARTY” MEANS A PERSON WHO IS:
(I) APPOINTED AS A GUARDIAN OF THE PERSON UNDER §
13–705 OF THE ESTATES AND TRUSTS ARTICLE;
(II) APPOINTED AS A GUARDIAN OF THE PROPERTY UNDER §
13–201 OF THE ESTATES AND TRUSTS ARTICLE;
(III) AN AGENT UNDER AN ADVANCE DIRECTIVE THAT IS VALID
UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 6 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(IV) A SURROGATE DECISION MAKER UNDER § 5–605 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE; OR
(V) AN ATTORNEY IN FACT UNDER A DURABLE POWER OF
ATTORNEY THAT IS VALID UNDER TITLE 17 OF THE ESTATES AND TRUSTS ARTICLE.
(2) “INTERESTED PARTY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PERSON DESCRIBED
UNDER § 13–707(A)(10) OF THE ESTATES AND TRUSTS ARTICLE.
(E) “PETITIONER” MEANS A PERSON WHO FILES A PETITION INDIVIDUALLY
OR JOINTLY WITH ANOTHER PERSON UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION
SEEKING VISITATION WITH AN ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON.
(F) “VISIT” OR “VISITATION” MEANS ANY IN–PERSON MEETING, OR ANY
TELEPHONIC, MAIL, OR ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION, BETWEEN THE PETITIONER
AND THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON.
15–102.

HOUSE BILL 134 3
IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO RECOGNIZE THE RIGHT OF
EVERY ADULT IN THE STATE TO HAVE VISITATION WITH WHOMEVER THE ADULT
CHOOSES, UNLESS A COURT HAS SPECIFICALLY ORDERED OTHERWISE OR THE
ADULT IS INCAPACITATED AND THE VISITATION IS NOT IN THE ADULT’S BEST
INTEREST.
15–103.
(A) THERE IS A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS
SECTION THAT IT IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF AN ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR
PROTECTED PERSON TO HAVE VISITATION FROM:
(1) THE SPOUSE OF THE PERSON, IF THE SPOUSE AND THE PERSON
ARE NOT LEGALLY SEPARATED;
(2) THE ADULT CHILDREN OF THE PERSON;
(3) THE ADULT GRANDCHILDREN OF THE PERSON;
(4) THE PARENTS OF THE PERSON;
(5) THE ADULT SIBLINGS OF THE PERSON; AND
(6) OTHER INTERESTED PARTIES.
(B) (1) A PERSON LISTED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY
PETITION THE COURT, IN THE JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE ALLEGED
INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON RESIDES OR IN THE COURT THAT
APPOINTED A GUARDIAN OF THE PERSON FOR THAT PERSON, FOR REASONABLE
VISITATION BY THAT PETITIONER WITH THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR
PROTECTED PERSON.
(2) A PETITION MAY NOT BE MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IF THE AUTHORIZED DECISION MAKER OF THE ALLEGED
INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON IS A PUBLIC GUARDIAN.
(C) A PETITION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) BE VERIFIED AND STATE FACTS SHOWING:
(I) THAT THE PETITIONER IS A PERSON LISTED IN SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION;

HOUSE BILL 134
(II) THAT VISITATION BY THE PETITIONER WITH THE ALLEGED
INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON HAS BEEN UNREASONABLY INTERFERED
WITH OR DENIED; AND
(III) THE IDENTITY OF THE PERSON OR PERSONS WHO HAVE
UNREASONABLY INTERFERED WITH OR DENIED VISITATION; AND
(2) INCLUDE A STATEMENT BY THE PETITIONER THAT THE
PETITIONER AGREES TO ABIDE BY ANY ORDER OF THE COURT ISSUED AS A
CONDITION OF EVALUATING THE PETITION AND THE PETITIONER, INCLUDING A
BACKGROUND CHECK, JUDGMENT SEARCH, OR MENTAL HEALTH SCREENING OR
EVALUATION.
(D) THE PETITIONER SHALL PERSONALLY SERVE A COPY OF THE PETITION
ON:
(1) THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON;
(2) THE ATTORNEY FOR THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR
PROTECTED PERSON;
(3) THE GUARDIAN OF THE PERSON OF THE ALLEGED
INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON, IF ANY;
(4) THE AUTHORIZED DECISION MAKER FOR THE ALLEGED
INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON;
(5) THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN, NURSE PRACTITIONER, OR
PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT FOR THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON;
(6) THE PRINCIPAL ADMINISTRATOR, OR THE ADMINISTRATOR’S
DESIGNEE, AND THE MEDICAL DIRECTOR OF A HEALTH CARE FACILITY PROVIDING
SERVICES TO THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON, IF ANY; AND
(7) ANY PERSON ALLEGED TO HAVE INTERFERED WITH OR DENIED
VISITATION.
(E) (1) AT ANY HEARING ON THE PETITION, IF EVIDENCE IS PRESENTED
THAT THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON OBJECTS TO THE
PETITION OR HAS IN THE PAST EXPRESSED AN OBJECTION TO VISITATION BY THE
PETITIONER, THE BURDEN OF PROOF DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL SHIFT TO THE PETITIONER TO PROVE, BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING
EVIDENCE, THAT THE ALLEGATION OF AN ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED
PERSON’S CURRENT OR PRIOR OBJECTION WAS NOT BASED ON RELIABLE EVIDENCE.

HOUSE BILL 134 5
(2) THE PRESUMPTION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION MAY BE REBUTTED BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT THE
VISITATION WOULD NOT BE IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE ALLEGED
INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON BECAUSE:
(I) THE PETITIONER HAS COMMITTED PHYSICAL OR FINANCIAL
ABUSE OR NEGLECT OR HAS BEEN THE SUBJECT OF A PROTECTIVE ORDER ISSUED
BY A COURT THAT RESTRICTED OR PROHIBITED CONDUCT BY THE PETITIONER;
(II) VISITATION IS CONTRARY TO THE WISHES OF THE ALLEGED
INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON;
(III) THE AUTHORIZED DECISION MAKER IS ACTING BASED ON A
RECOMMENDATION OF AN ATTENDING PHYSICIAN OR A PROTECTIVE ORDER ISSUED
BY A COURT;
(IV) THE PETITIONER’S AFFIDAVIT DOES NOT QUALIFY THE
PETITIONER AS AN INTERESTED PARTY;
(V) STATEMENTS, WRITINGS, OR ACTIONS BY THE ALLEGED
INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON DEMONSTRATE THAT THE ALLEGED
INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON:
1. DOES NOT WANT VISITATION WITH THE PETITIONER;
OR
2. INTENDED TO VEST COMPLETE AUTHORITY OVER
VISITATION WITH THE AUTHORIZED DECISION MAKER; OR
(VI) THE VISITATION WOULD BE HARMFUL TO THE HEALTH OR
MENTAL WELL–BEING OF THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON.
(F) (1) IN RULING ON A PETITION UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COURT
SHALL ISSUE A STATEMENT OF FACTS AND LAW.
(2) THE COURT MAY IMPOSE REASONABLE RESTRICTIONS ON A
VISITATION ORDERED UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING TIME AND FREQUENCY
LIMITATIONS AND REQUIRING THAT VISITATIONS BE MONITORED AT THE
PETITIONER’S EXPENSE.
(G) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COURT
MAY ASSESS COSTS OF THE PETITION OR VISITATION, INCLUDING THE COST OF
MONITORING VISITS, TO THE PETITIONER UNDER THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 134
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COURT
MAY ASSESS SANCTIONS, IN THE AMOUNT OF THE REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES
INCURRED, AGAINST A PETITIONER WHO FILES A PETITION UNDER THIS SECTION IN
BAD FAITH OR AGAINST A PARTY THAT IS CLAIMED TO HAVE UNJUSTIFIABLY
INTERFERED WITH OR DENIED VISITATION.
(3) NO COSTS OR SANCTIONS UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE ASSESSED
AGAINST THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON WHO IS THE
SUBJECT OF THE PETITION.
(4) AN AUTHORIZED DECISION MAKER, A HEALTH CARE FACILITY, OR
AN EMPLOYEE OR AGENT OF A HEALTH CARE FACILITY WHO DENIES OR RESTRICTS
A VISIT OR VISITATION SHALL BE IMMUNE FROM CIVIL LIABILITY IF THE
RESTRICTION OR DENIAL IS BASED ON:
(I) A COURT ORDER ISSUED TO DENY OR RESTRICT VISITATION;
OR
(II) A GOOD FAITH BELIEF THAT A VISIT OR VISITATION IS NOT
IN THE BEST INTEREST OF AN ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON.
(H) ON WRITTEN REQUEST BY AN INTERESTED PARTY, AN AUTHORIZED
DECISION MAKER SHALL, WITHIN 72 HOURS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE REQUEST,
IDENTIFY IN WRITING OR BY ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION:
(1) THE HEALTH CARE FACILITY OR OTHER LOCATION WHERE THE
ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON IS RESIDING;
(2) ALL CURRENT FUNERAL ARRANGEMENTS; OR
(3) THE BURIAL LOCATION OR DISPOSITION OF THE BODY OF THE
DECEASED ALLEGED INCAPACITATED OR PROTECTED PERSON.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.